California statutes. Public Contract Code
The commission shall, pursuant to an order entered in the minutes, advertise for bids for the construction of the project either as a whole or in sections, as it may deem fit, in accordance with the plan theretofore adopted and filed, by publishing a notice calling for bids at least once each week for two successive weeks in a newspaper of general circulation published within the district. The notice shall refer to the order and plan for further particulars. If the commission elects to receive separate bids for the construction of sections of the project, the order shall describe the sections for which separate bids are desired. The commission may advertise at the same time and in the same notice both for bids for the construction of the project as a whole and for bids for the construction of separate sections.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 465, Sec. 11.)
-------------------------------------------

20471.5.

All bids for construction work shall be presented under sealed cover and shall be accompanied by one of the following forms of bidders security:

(a) Cash.

(b) A cashier’s check made payable to the commission.

(c) A certified check made payable to the commission.

(d) A bidder’s bond executed by an admitted surety insurer, made payable to the commission.

Upon an award to the lowest bidder, the security of an unsuccessful bidder shall be returned in a reasonable period of time, but in no event shall that security be held by the commission beyond 60 days from the time the award is made.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 808, Sec. 29.)
-------------------------------------------

20472.

Every contract for the construction of the project or for any section, if it is to be constructed in sections, shall be let, after advertisement, to the lowest responsible bidder, or the commission may reject all bids for the construction of the project or for any section, and may readvertise for bids for doing the work in the same manner and for the same length of time as provided for a notice calling for bids for construction.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 465, Sec. 11.)
-------------------------------------------

20473.

Before the making of any contract the bidder shall give a bond to the district for the faithful performance of his contract, which shall be signed by the bidder and sureties satisfactory to the commission, in an amount equal to at least 50 percent of the amount of the contract price and shall give another bond conditioned upon the payment of claims for labor and material in connection with the performance of his contract containing the terms and conditions set forth in Chapter 3 of Division 5 of Title 1 of the Government Code and subject to the provisions of that chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 465, Sec. 11.)
-------------------------------------------

20474.

The contract shall be executed on behalf of the district by the commission, subject to approval or rejection by the electors of the district, expressed at an election called for the purpose of issuing bonds or authorizing the tax levy for the payment of the contract. If the electors fail to approve the bond issue, or fail to authorize the tax levy, the contract shall be null and void without notice and the commission shall immediately return the bonds to the contractor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 465, Sec. 11.)
-------------------------------------------

20475.

The commission may do any or all maintenance or repair work upon the project, either with or without contract, and with or without advertising for bids for contracts, unless the cost of the work exceeds one thousand dollars ($1,000), in which event it shall be done only under contract after advertising for bids in the same manner and for the same length of time as provided for advertising for bids and letting contracts for construction work.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 465, Sec. 11.)
-------------------------------------------

20476.

The commission may hire all necessary engineers, inspectors and superintendents to supervise the performance of contracts entered into by the commission, or to have charge of doing all work done without contract.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 465, Sec. 11.)
-------------------------------------------

20477.

As to any project involving a state highway where the plans have been approved by the Department of Transportation, Division of Highways, the commission and the department may enter into and carry out contracts pursuant to Section 130 of the Streets and Highways Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 465, Sec. 11.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 29. Public Entities—Municipal Improvement Act of 1913 [20480. - 20497.]

20480.

The provisions of this article shall apply to contracts by cities, cities and counties, or counties, or other entities, public corporations, or agencies authorized to operate under the Municipal Improvement Act of 1913, as provided for in Division 12 (commencing with Section 10000) of the Streets and Highways Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 465, Sec. 11.)
-------------------------------------------

20481.

At any time after the preliminary approval of the report provided for in Section 10300 of the Streets and Highways Code, the legislative body may let the contract or contracts for all or any part of the improvement and authorize such acts and proceedings as are necessary to acquire works or appliances already installed, or other property, as authorized by this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 465, Sec. 11.)
-------------------------------------------

20482.

Each contract shall be let to the lowest responsible bidder after notice inviting sealed proposals is published pursuant to Section 6066 of the Government Code in a newspaper published in the municipality, and designated by the legislative body for that purpose, or if there is no such newspaper by such posting as the legislative body may provide. The time fixed for the opening of the bids shall not be less than 14 days after the first publication or posting of the notice.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 465, Sec. 11.)
-------------------------------------------

20483.

(a)All bids for construction work shall be presented under sealed cover and shall be accompanied by one of the following forms of bidder’s security which amounts to 10 percent of the bid:

(1) Cash.

(2) A cashier’s check made payable to the legislative body.

(3) A certified check made payable to the legislative body.

(4) A bidder’s bond executed by an admitted surety insurer, made payable to the legislative body.

The amount so posted shall be forfeited to the municipality if the bidder does not, within 15 days after written notice that the contract has been awarded to the bidder, enter into a contract with the municipality for the work. Upon an award to the lowest bidder, the security of an unsuccessful bidder shall be returned in a reasonable period of time, but in no event shall that security be held by the legislative body beyond 60 days from the time the award is made.

(b) The faithful performance of the contract shall be secured by an undertaking in that penal sum as the legislative body requires, but not less than 25 percent of the contract price, satisfactory to the legislative body. When the proceedings include the acquisition or construction of works, appliances, or improvements to be owned, managed or controlled by a public agency other than the municipality making the acquisitions or ordering the work done, the legislative body of the municipality may require that the undertaking also inure to the benefit of the public agency to the extent of its interest in the entire project. The contractor shall also furnish a labor and material bond as required by law in a sum not less than 50 percent of the contract price.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 808, Sec. 30.)
-------------------------------------------

20484.

Notice of award of the contract shall be published by the clerk of the legislative body once in the newspaper in which the notice of improvement was published.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 465, Sec. 11.)
-------------------------------------------

20485.

The owners of three-fourths of the area of lands assessed or liable to be assessed, or their agents (who shall make oath that they are such owners or agents), shall not be required to present sealed proposals or bids, but may, within 10 days after the publication of the notice of the award of the contract, elect to take the work and enter into a written contract to do the whole work at prices not exceeding the prices specified in the bid of the bidder to whom the contract was awarded, and all work done under such contract shall be subject to such regulations as may be prescribed by the legislative body.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 465, Sec. 11.)
-------------------------------------------

20486.

If the owners fail to elect to take the work and to enter into a written contract therefor within 10 days, or to commence the work within 15 days after the date of the written contract, and to prosecute the same with diligence to completion, a contract shall be entered into with the original bidder to whom the contract was awarded at the prices specified in his bid.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 465, Sec. 11.)
-------------------------------------------

20487.

If, in the opinion of the legislative body, the public interest will not be served by allowing the property owners to take a contract, it may so provide in the resolution of intention. In that event, no notice of award of contract need be published pursuant to Section 20484.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 538, Sec. 548.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

20488.

The contract shall provide that the work shall be done strictly in accordance with the plans and specifications contained in the report provided for in Sections 10200, 10201, 10202, 10203, 10204, and 10300 of the Streets and Highways Code. The work shall be done under the supervision of the board officer, or person by whom the report was made, and no work or portion of the work shall be paid for until it is approved for payment by that board officer, or person, but this shall not prevent approval of and payment for completed portions of the work as it progresses. Payment made for completed portions of the work shall not constitute final acceptance of these portions or of the completed project.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 465, Sec. 11.)
-------------------------------------------

20489.

The provisions of the Improvement Act of 1911 relating to liquidated damages are incorporated in this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 465, Sec. 11.)
-------------------------------------------

20490.

If the contractor abandons the work, or fails to proceed with the work as rapidly as required by his contract, the legislative body may declare him in default and relet the work in the manner set forth in this chapter for letting the original contract, or it may complete the work by direct purchase of labor and materials, and retain out of any funds due or to become due the contractor the amount of the cost of the work and any expense incidental to reletting the contract or performing the work, and also hold the contractor and his sureties responsible for such cost and expense, and for any damages resulting from the abandonment or failure upon his bond.

Notice of the declaration of default shall be given by the clerk of the legislative body by personal service or by mail. Upon receipt of such notice, the contractor shall forthwith quit the work, and shall receive no payment for any work performed thereafter unless ordered to resume the work by the legislative body.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 465, Sec. 11.)
-------------------------------------------

20491.

At any time within 10 days after the award of any contract pursuant to this chapter, or if no bids are received, at any time within 10 days after the time fixed for the opening of bids by resolution adopted by a vote of two-thirds of all its members, the legislative body may order that the proposed contract be not made, and that the municipality itself execute the work in accordance with the plans and specifications adopted for the work.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 465, Sec. 11.)
-------------------------------------------

20492.

If the work is abandoned by the city before work is actually started or before any materials, supplies or equipment have been furnished or used, the incidental expenses incurred previous to such abandonment, unless provision has otherwise been made therefor, shall be paid out of the city treasury, but such expense for which the city is liable and which shall have been paid by it may be charged as incidental expenses against the district benefited in any new proceeding had or taken for any work which includes substantially the same work as that which was included in the abandoned proceedings.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 465, Sec. 11.)
-------------------------------------------

20496.

The provisions of Title 3 (commencing with Section 9000) of Part 6 of Division 4 of the Civil Code are hereby expressly made applicable to the construction of works and improvements under this article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 697, Sec. 50.   (SB 189)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative July 1, 2012, by Sec. 105 of Ch. 697.)
-------------------------------------------

20497.

If in the opinion of the legislative body the public interest will not be served by allowing the property owners to take the contract it may so provide in the resolution of intention.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 465, Sec. 11.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 30. City Councils—Street Lighting Act of 1919 [20500. - 20507.]

20500.

The provisions of this article shall apply to contracts by a city council, as provided in the Street Lighting Act of 1919, Part 1 (commencing with Section 18000) of Division 14 of the Streets and Highways Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 465, Sec. 11.)
-------------------------------------------

20501.

(a) The city council shall, within 10 days after the establishment of the district, invite bids for the making of the improvement by ordering a notice of the invitation to be published by two successive insertions in a daily or weekly newspaper published or circulated in the city and designated by the city council for that purpose. However, if the city council determines that there is only one contractor practically capable of serving the street lighting system to be improved in the manner provided in the plans and specifications contained in the report provided for in Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 18040) of Part 1 of Division 14 of the Streets and Highways Code and that the contractor is subject to the jurisdiction of the Public Utilities Commission of the State of California, the city council may, in its discretion, without competitive bidding, order the improvement to be carried out by the contractor in accordance with rates and rules filed by it from time to time with the Public Utilities Commission.

(b) All bids for construction work shall be presented under sealed cover and shall be accompanied by one of the following forms of bidder’s security which amounts to 10 percent of the bid:

(1) Cash.

(2) A cashier’s check made payable to the city.

(3) A certified check made payable to the city.

(4) A bidder’s bond executed by an admitted surety insurer, made payable to the city.

The security shall be forfeited to the city in case the bidder depositing it does not, within 15 days after the notice that the contract has been awarded to him or her, enter into a contract with the city for making the improvement, the faithful performance of which shall be secured by an undertaking in those penal sums as the city council shall require, with sureties satisfactory to that body. In any case where competitive bidding is required, the contract shall be awarded to the lowest responsible bidder. Upon an award to the lowest bidder, the security of an unsuccessful bidder shall be returned in a reasonable period of time, but in no event shall that security be held by the city beyond 60 days from the time the award is made.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 808, Sec. 31.)
-------------------------------------------

20502.

The contract shall require that the improvement be made, and the improvement shall be made, strictly in accordance with the plans and specifications contained in the report provided for in Chapter 3 of Part 1 of Division 14 of the Streets and Highways Code.

The contract for service shall be for a period not less than three years from and after the date electric energy and service is first delivered to the lighting district pursuant to such contract and shall be extended automatically thereafter for successive terms of one year each; provided, that the agreement may be terminated by either party upon not less than 60 days’ written notice prior to the expiration date of the original term or any extended term; and provided further, that the contract for service may be for a period of less than three years by mutual consent of the city council and the contractor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 465, Sec. 11.)
-------------------------------------------

20503.

The improvement shall be made under the supervision of the board, officer or person designated by the city council, and no portion shall be paid for until it has been accepted by that board, officer or person.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 465, Sec. 11.)
-------------------------------------------

20504.

If the contractor abandons the making of the improvement, or fails to proceed with it as rapidly as required by his contract, the city council may relet the contract in the same manner as in the case of the first letting thereof and retain the amount of the cost of the portion relet, and of any expenses incidental to the reletting, out of any funds due or to become due to the contractor. The city council may also hold the contractor and his sureties responsible upon his bond for such cost and expense, and for any damages resulting from such abandonment or failure.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 465, Sec. 11.)
-------------------------------------------

20505.

The city council may, at any time within 20 days after the opening of bids, or, if no bids are received, at any time within 20 days after the time fixed for the opening of bids, order by resolution adopted by a vote of two-thirds of all of its members, that the city itself execute the work of the improvement, or any part thereof, in accordance with the plans and specifications adopted for such work, or for such part thereof, and employ the labor and provide the materials, appliances, supplies or illuminating agent necessary therefor. The cost and expenses of such work, or of such part thereof, shall be paid out of the special fund collected to pay for the improvement. If the city council orders that only a part of the work of the improvement be executed by the city then the city council may reject all bids, if any, received for such part of the work and may proceed with the award of the contract for the remaining part of the work.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 465, Sec. 11.)
-------------------------------------------

20506.

If the work of the improvement, or any part thereof, is executed by the city, then the amount appropriated and used from the special fund to pay the costs and expenses of the work or part thereof executed by the city shall not exceed the amount of the respective lowest valid bid received for such work or for such part thereof, or, if no bids have been received and the work of the improvement is executed by the city the amount appropriated and used from the special fund to pay the costs and expenses of such work shall not exceed the amount of the respective estimate thereof provided for in Section 18041 of the Streets and Highways Code. If such costs and expenses exceed the amount of the said bid, or of the said estimate in case no bids are received, then such excess cost and expense shall be paid out of any moneys in the general fund in the city treasury.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 465, Sec. 11.)
-------------------------------------------

20507.

At any time after the funds for the proposed improvement, or any part thereof, are in the hands of the city treasurer, the city council may, without calling for bids, order by resolution, adopted by a vote of two-thirds of all its members, that the city itself execute the work of such improvement, or any part thereof, in accordance with the plans and specifications adopted for such work or for such part thereof, and employ the labor, and provide the materials, appliances, supplies or illuminating agent necessary therefor. In such case the costs and expenses of such work, or of such part thereof, shall be paid out of the aforesaid funds, except that if such costs and expenses exceed the amount of the respective estimates provided for in Section 18041 of the Streets and Highways Code, then such excess shall be paid out of the moneys in the general fund in the city treasury.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 465, Sec. 11.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 31. City Councils—Street Lighting Act of 1931 [20510. - 20514.]

20510.

The provisions of this article shall apply to contracts by a city council, as provided in the Street Lighting Act of 1931, Part 2 (commencing with Section 18300) of Division 14 of the Streets and Highways Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 465, Sec. 11.)
-------------------------------------------

20511.

At any time after the installment assessment becomes delinquent, the superintendent of streets may call for bids for such improvement and may fix a date, not less than 20 nor more than 30 days after the publication of a notice inviting bids for such improvement, for the receipt of such bids at his office at an hour not later than 10 a.m. on such date. Such notice shall be published once in a daily or weekly newspaper published and circulated in the city and designated by the city council for that purpose.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 465, Sec. 11.)
-------------------------------------------

20512.

All bids for construction work shall be presented under sealed cover and shall be accompanied by one of the following forms of bidder’s security which amounts to 10 percent of the bid:

(a) Cash.

(b) A cashier’s check made payable to the city.

(c) A certified check made payable to the city.

(d) A bidder’s bond executed by an admitted surety insurer, made payable to the city.

The check or bond shall be forfeited to the city if the bidder depositing it does not within 10 days after the publication of a notice of award of the contract to him or her, enter into the necessary contract with the city. Upon an award to the lowest bidder, the security of an unsuccessful bidder shall be returned in a reasonable period of time, but in no event shall that security be held by the city beyond 60 days from the time the award is made.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 808, Sec. 32.)
-------------------------------------------

20513.

The contract shall specify a date certain when the improvement shall be started, the date to be not more than 30 days after the execution thereof, and that the contract shall continue in force for a period of one year from the effective date of the contract.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 465, Sec. 11.)
-------------------------------------------

20514.

The city council may, by resolution passed prior to the notice inviting bids, impose such other reasonable conditions, including faithful performance bonds and materialmen’s bonds, as may in its discretion appear to be necessary and proper.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 465, Sec. 11.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 32. City Councils—Municipal Lighting Maintenance District Act of 1927 [20520. - 20522.]

20520.

The provisions of this article shall apply to contracts by a city council, as provided in the Municipal Lighting Maintenance District Act of 1927, Part 3 (commencing with Section 18600) of Division 14 of the Streets and Highways Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 465, Sec. 11.)
-------------------------------------------

20521.

The city council shall make all contracts and all necessary provisions for the furnishing of the maintenance and operation finally determined upon for the lighting systems which are to be maintained and operated from funds of the district. Such contracts shall be made in the same manner and after the same notice and by the same persons as other city contracts for such items of maintenance and operation are made unless such contracts of the city are not required to be made after competitive bidding. In that case the contracts for the district shall be let only after competitive bidding and the officer whose duty it is to let contracts for such items for the city shall give or cause to be given a notice inviting sealed bids on the items to be purchased and fix a time and place at which the bids will be opened and declared in public. The contract shall be awarded to the lowest responsible bidder, or if necessary for the public good any and all bids may be rejected and in such case readvertisement shall be had in the same manner as before. The notice inviting bids shall be published at least twice and the first publication shall be at least 10 days before the time set for opening the sealed bids.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 465, Sec. 11.)
-------------------------------------------

20522.

(a) All bids for construction work shall be presented under sealed cover and shall be accompanied by one of the following forms of bidder’s security:

(1) Cash.

(2) A cashier’s check made payable to the district.

(3) A certified check made payable to the district.

(4) A bidder’s bond executed by an admitted surety insurer, made payable to the district.

(b) Upon an award to the lowest bidder, the security of an unsuccessful bidder shall be returned in a reasonable period of time, but in no event shall that security be held by the district beyond 60 days from the time the award is made.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 538, Sec. 549.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 33. Joint Highway Districts [20530. - 20541.]

20530.

The provisions of this article shall apply to contracts by a joint highway district, as provided in the Joint Highway District Act, Part 1 (commencing with Section 25000) of Division 16 of the Streets and Highways Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 465, Sec. 11.)
-------------------------------------------

20531.

All construction work shall be done by contract awarded to the lowest responsible bidder after advertising for bids in a newspaper of general circulation published and circulated within the district which has been designated by the secretary or the board of directors for that purpose. The advertising shall be done by means of two publications of the notice inviting bids the first of which shall be not less than 10 days prior to the time fixed for receiving the bids.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 465, Sec. 11.)
-------------------------------------------

20532.

All bids for construction work shall be presented under sealed cover and shall be accompanied by one of the following forms of bidder’s security:

(a) Cash.

(b) A cashier’s check made payable to the district.

(c) A certified check made payable to the district.

(d) A bidder’s bond executed by an admitted surety insurer, made payable to the district.

Upon an award to the lowest bidder, the security of an unsuccessful bidder shall be returned in a reasonable period of time, but in no event shall that security be held by the district beyond 60 days from the time the award is made.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 808, Sec. 34.)
-------------------------------------------

20533.

All bids shall be delivered to the secretary of the board of directors not later than the hour fixed for receiving bids and shall thereafter be publicly opened by the secretary in the presence of the board of directors assembled in public session.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 465, Sec. 11.)
-------------------------------------------

20534.

The board of directors shall award the contract to the lowest responsible bidder. However, before awarding the contract the board may:

(a) Reject all bids should it deem this necessary for the good of the district.

(b) Reject the bid of any bidder who has been delinquent or unfaithful in any former contract with either the district, or any county composing the district, or with the state.

(c) Reject the bid of any bidder who is unable to satisfy the board of directors of his ability, financially or otherwise, to perform the contract for the proposed work.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 465, Sec. 11.)
-------------------------------------------

20535.

If all bids have been rejected because it appears that they are too high and that the work can be done more cheaply by day labor, the board may, in lieu of readvertising for bids, order the work done by day labor under the supervision of the district engineer.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 465, Sec. 11.)
-------------------------------------------

20536.

The bidder to whom any contract is awarded shall, within 20 days after the date of the award by the board of directors, execute a contract to perform the work. The contract shall be in a form approved by an attorney employed by the board of directors.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 465, Sec. 11.)
-------------------------------------------

20537.

Before the contract is executed, the person to whom it is awarded shall execute bonds for the faithful performance of the contract and for the payment of all claims for labor and material thereunder in the manner provided by law and in the form approved by an attorney employed by the board of directors.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 465, Sec. 11.)
-------------------------------------------

20538.

All of the bonds shall be executed by the bidder and by a corporate surety duly authorized to do business as such under the laws of the State of California. Each bond shall be in an amount not less than 50 percent of the aggregate contract price. The contract shall not be executed on behalf of the district until all the contract bonds are approved by the president of the board of directors and the district engineer.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 465, Sec. 11.)
-------------------------------------------

20539.

The president or vice president and secretary or assistant secretary shall sign and attest all construction contracts on behalf of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 465, Sec. 11.)
-------------------------------------------

20540.

All construction contracts shall provide that a maximum of eight hours shall constitute a day’s labor and that three dollars ($3) shall be the minimum amount paid for a day’s labor performed upon any construction work covered by the contract.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 465, Sec. 11.)
-------------------------------------------

20541.

If any bidder to whom a contract is awarded fails to enter into the contract and execute the required bonds, the board of directors shall declare the check accompanying the bid of such bidder to be forfeited. Upon cashing the check the proceeds shall be placed to the credit of the construction fund of the district. The board of directors may thereupon award the contract to the next lowest responsible and acceptable bidder, or may call for new bids.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 465, Sec. 11.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 34. Boulevard Districts [20550. - 20557.]

20550.

The provisions of this article shall apply to contracts by a boulevard district, as provided for in Part 2 (commencing with Section 26000) of Division 16 of the Streets and Highways Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 465, Sec. 11.)
-------------------------------------------

20551.

The commission shall, pursuant to an order entered in its minutes, advertise for bids for the construction of the boulevard, either as a whole or in sections as it may see fit, in accordance with the plan theretofore adopted and filed, by publishing a notice calling for bids at least once a week for two successive weeks in a weekly newspaper published within the district if there is such a newspaper published therein, otherwise in a newspaper published at the county seat of the county in which the district is located. The notice shall refer to the order and plan for further particulars. If the commission elects to receive separate bids for the construction of sections of the boulevard, the order shall describe the sections for which separate bids are desired.

The commission may advertise at the same time and in the same notice both for bids for the construction of the boulevard as a whole and for bids for the construction of separate sections.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 465, Sec. 11.)
-------------------------------------------

20551.5.

All bids for construction work shall be presented under sealed cover and shall be accompanied by one of the following forms of bidder’s security:

(a) Cash.

(b) A cashier’s check made payable to the district.

(c) A certified check made payable to the district.

(d) A bidder’s bond executed by an admitted surety insurer, made payable to the district.

Upon an award to the lowest bidder, the security of an unsuccessful bidder shall be returned in a reasonable period of time, but in no event shall that security be held by the district beyond 60 days from the time the award is made.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 808, Sec. 35.)
-------------------------------------------

20552.

Every contract for the construction of the boulevard or for any section, if it is to be constructed in sections, shall be let, after advertisement, to the lowest responsible bidder, or the commission shall reject all bids for the construction of the boulevard or for any section and may readvertise for bids for doing the work in the same manner and for the same time as bids were originally called for.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 465, Sec. 11.)
-------------------------------------------

20553.

Before the making of any contract the bidder shall give a bond to the district for the faithful performance of his contract, which shall be signed by the bidder and sureties satisfactory to the commission in an amount equal to at least 50 percent of the amount of the contract price.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 465, Sec. 11.)
-------------------------------------------

20554.

The contract shall be executed on behalf of the district by the commission, subject to approval or rejection by the electors of the district, expressed at an election called for the purpose of issuing bonds for the payment of the contract. If the electors fail to approve the bond issue, the contract shall be void and the commission shall immediately return the bond to the contractor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 465, Sec. 11.)
-------------------------------------------

20555.

If the cost of any construction work on the boulevard does not exceed one thousand dollars ($1,000) the commission may make contracts therefor without advertisement or it may do the work without letting any contract.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 465, Sec. 11.)
-------------------------------------------

20556.

The commission may do any or all maintenance or repair work upon the boulevard, either with or without contract, and with or without advertising for bids for contracts unless the cost of the work exceeds one thousand dollars ($1,000), in which event it shall only be done under contract after advertising for bids in the same manner as provided for advertising for bids and letting contracts for construction work.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 465, Sec. 11.)
-------------------------------------------

20557.

The commission may hire all necessary engineers, inspectors and superintendents to supervise the performance of contracts entered into by the commission, or to have charge of doing all work done without contract.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 465, Sec. 11.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 35. Irrigation Districts [20560. - 20570.]

20560.

The provisions of this article shall apply to contracts by irrigation districts, as provided for in the Irrigation District Law, Division 11 (commencing with Section 20500) of the Water Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 465, Sec. 11.)
-------------------------------------------

20561.

As used in this article “works” is limited to any works to be paid for with the proceeds of the sale of bonds or a limited assessment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 465, Sec. 11.)
-------------------------------------------

20562.

Contracts for the construction of any works shall be made pursuant to the provisions of this article except when the board, with the approval of the commission, elects to proceed to construct the works or any part thereof under its own superintendence.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 465, Sec. 11.)
-------------------------------------------

20563.

The board shall give notice by publication once a week for three successive weeks in a newspaper published in the county in which the principal office of a district is kept, or if no newspaper is published in that county, in a newspaper the board deems advisable, calling for bids for the construction of the works or of any portion of them.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 538, Sec. 550.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

20564.

The notice calling for bids shall contain:

(a) A statement that the plans and specifications of the works to be constructed may be seen at the district office.

(b) A particular description of the portion of the works advertised if less than the whole works are advertised.

(c) A statement that the board will receive sealed bids for the construction of the works advertised or any portion of them designated by the board.

(d) A statement that the contract or contracts for the works advertised will be awarded to the lowest responsible bidder or bidders, but that any or all bids may be rejected.

(e) A statement of the time and place for opening the bids.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 465, Sec. 11.)
-------------------------------------------

20564.5.

All bids for construction work shall be presented under sealed cover and shall be accompanied by one of the following forms of bidder’s security:

(a) Cash.

(b) A cashier’s check made payable to the district.

(c) A certified check made payable to the district.

(d) A bidder’s bond executed by an admitted surety insurer, made payable to the district.

Upon an award to the lowest bidder, the security of an unsuccessful bidder shall be returned in a reasonable period of time, but in no event shall that security be held by the district beyond 60 days from the time the award is made.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 808, Sec. 36.)
-------------------------------------------

20565.

At the time and place appointed the bids shall be opened in public.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 465, Sec. 11.)
-------------------------------------------

20566.
